District of Columbia statutes.
7-1206.03

Notice Requirement — Clients in group sessions.

Mental health professionals shall provide clients in a group session with a written statement of the prohibition against the unauthorized disclosure of mental health information and the penalties provided in this chapter for unauthorized disclosure.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 603, 25 DCR 5055

History

1981 Ed., § 6-2053.
1973 Ed., § 6-1640.

Prior Codifications